Idaho statutes. Title 10 ISSUES, TRIAL AND JUDGMENT IN CIVIL ACTIONS
Chapter 11
MANNER OF GIVING AND ENTERING JUDGMENT — LIEN AND SATISFACTION

Sec.

§ 10-1101. Time for entering judgment. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1102. Argument on reserved point. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1103. Affirmative judgment for defendant. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1104. Form of judgment. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1105. Judgment book. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1106. Death after verdict — Entry and effect of judgment.

If a party die after a verdict or decision upon any issue of fact, and before judgment, the court may nevertheless render judgment thereon. Such judgment is not a lien on the real property of the deceased party, but is payable in the course of administration on his estate.

§ 10-1107. Judgment roll

Contents. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1108. Indorsement of judgment in docket. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1109. State and federal court judgments

Lien. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1110. Filing transcript of judgments — Lien acquired.

A transcript or abstract of any judgment or decree of any court of this state or any court of the United States the enforcement of which has not been stayed as provided by law, if rendered within this state, certified by the clerk having custody thereof, may be recorded with the recorder of any county of this state, who shall immediately record and docket the same as by law provided, and from the time of such recording, and not before, the judgment so recorded becomes a lien upon all real property of the judgment debtor in the county, not exempt from execution, owned by him at the time or acquired afterwards at any time prior to the expiration of the lien; provided that where a transcript or abstract is recorded of any judgment or decree of divorce or separate maintenance making provision for installment or periodic payment of sums for maintenance of children or alimony or allowance for wife’s support, such judgment or decree shall be a lien only in an amount for payments so provided, delinquent or not made when due. The lien resulting from recording of a judgment other than for support of a child or for restitution owed to a crime victim where the order of restitution has been recorded as a judgment pursuant to section 19-5305, Idaho Code, continues ten (10) years from the date of the judgment, unless the judgment be previously satisfied, or unless the enforcement of the judgment be stayed upon an appeal as provided by law. A lien arising from the delinquency of a payment due under a judgment for support of a child issued by an Idaho court continues until ten (10) years after the death or emancipation of the last child for whom support is owed under the judgment unless the underlying judgment is renewed, is previously satisfied or the enforcement of the judgment is stayed upon an appeal as provided by law. A lien arising from an order for restitution to a crime victim where the order of restitution has been recorded as a judgment pursuant to section 19-5305, Idaho Code, continues until twenty (20) years from the date of the judgment, unless the judgment be previously satisfied, or unless the judgment is stayed or set aside. The transcript or abstract above mentioned shall contain the title of the court and cause and number of action, names of judgment creditors and debtors, time of entry and amount of judgment.

§ 10-1111. Orders renewing judgment — Lien.

Unless the judgment has been satisfied, at any time prior to the expiration of the lien created by section 10-1110, Idaho Code, or any renewal thereof, the court that entered the judgment, other than a judgment for child support, may, upon motion, renew such judgment by entry of an order renewing judgment. The order renewing judgment may be recorded in the same manner as the original judgment, and the lien established or continued thereby shall continue for ten (10) years from the date of the order renewing judgment. Entry of an order renewing judgment maintains both the date of the original judgment and the priority of collection thereof, and it begins anew the time limitation for an action upon a judgment set forth in section 5-215, Idaho Code.

Unless the judgment has been satisfied, and prior to the expiration of the lien created in section 10-1110, Idaho Code, or any renewal thereof, a court that has entered a judgment for child support may, upon motion, renew such judgment by entry of an order renewing judgment. The entry of an order renewing judgment shall not affect the manner of enforcement of the original judgment, and the lien established or continued thereby shall continue for ten (10) years from the date of the order renewing judgment. Entry of an order renewing judgment maintains both the date of the original judgment and the priority of collection thereof, and it begins anew the time limitation for an action upon a judgment set forth in section 5-215, Idaho Code.

§ 10-1112. Inspection of docket. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1113. Entry of satisfaction. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1114. Duty to satisfy judgment

Penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 10-1115. Additional procedure for satisfaction of judgment — Disposition of money.

As a further procedure for the satisfaction of a judgment, and in addition to the satisfaction of a judgment as provided by law or rule of court, any person, against whom exists a judgment for the payment of money or who is interested in any property upon which any such judgment is a lien, may pay the amount due on such judgment to the clerk of the court in which such judgment was rendered, and such clerk shall thereupon release and satisfy such judgment upon the records of said court and the county in which such judgment was rendered; and if such judgment has been entered in the records or docketed in any other county than the county in which it was rendered, then a certified copy of the release and satisfaction herein provided to be entered may be recorded in such other county, and the clerk of such other county shall thereupon release and satisfy such judgment upon the records of such other county. Unless the clerk of the court in which such judgment was rendered sooner turns over the money paid to him on such judgment to the person determined by such court to be entitled thereto, he shall turn the same over to the county treasurer of his county, who shall give said clerk duplicate receipts therefor; and one of said receipts shall be filed with the papers in the case in which such judgment was rendered, and the other shall be retained by said clerk. Said county treasurer shall at any time pay said money over to the person who shall be determined to be entitled thereto by the order of the court in which such judgment was rendered.